Utah statutes.
78A-10-203.   Procedure.

(1)  Four commissioners are a quorum.

(2)  The governor shall appoint a member of the governor's staff to serve as staff to the Appellate Court Nominating Commission.

(3)  The governor shall:

(a)  ensure that the commission follows the rules promulgated by the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice; and

(b)  resolve any questions regarding those rules.

(4)  A member of the commission who is also a member of the Utah State Bar may recuse himself if there is a conflict of interest that makes the member unable to serve.

